New Jersey, session 221, A5730.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  An acute care general hospital licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) shall offer perform a psychological and psychiatric evaluation on a patient, who is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, prior to releasing the patient from the hospital. 2.  a.  A hospital service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1938, c.366 (C.17:48-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those hospital service corporation contracts in which the hospital service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. 3.    a.  A medical service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1940, c.74 (C.17:48A-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of P.L. , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those medical service corporation contracts in which the medical service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. 4.    a.  A health service corporation contract that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1985, c.236 (C.17:48E-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those health service corporation contracts in which the health service corporation has reserved the right to change the premium. 5.    a.  An individual health insurance policy that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to N.J.S.17B:26-1 et seq., or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the policy. c.     This section shall apply to those individual health insurance policies in which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium. 6.    a.  A group health insurance policy that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to N.J.S.17B:27-26 et seq., or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the policy. c.     This section shall apply to those group health insurance policies in which the insurer has reserved the right to change the premium. 7.    a.  An individual health benefits plan that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1992, c.161 (C.17B:27A-2 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the plan. c.     This section shall apply to those health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. 8.    a. A small employer health benefits plan that provides hospital and medical expense benefits and is delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1992, c.162 (C.17B:27A-17 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the plan. c.     This section shall apply to those health benefits plans in which the carrier has reserved the right to change the premium. 9.    a.  A health maintenance organization contract for health care services that is delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State pursuant to P.L.1973, c.337 (C.26:2J-1 et seq.), or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. c.     This section shall apply to those contracts for health care services under which the health maintenance organization has reserved the right to change the schedule of charges for enrollee coverage. 10.  a.  The State Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) that provides hospital and medical expense benefits shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. 11.   a.  The School Employees Health Benefits Commission shall ensure that every contract purchased by the commission on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) that provides hospital and medical expense benefits shall include benefits for a psychological and psychiatric evaluation performed by a hospital on a patient, prior to the patients release from the hospital, if the patient is being treated by the hospital for a drug overdose, as provided in section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). For the purposes of this section, hospital means an acute care general hospital, licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). b.    The benefits provided under this section shall be provided to the same extent as for any other medical condition under the contract. 12. The Commissioner of Health shall adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as are necessary to effectuate section 1 of this act. 13. This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following enactment and shall apply to all health benefits plans that are delivered, issued, executed, or renewed in this State, or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, on or after the effective date of this act.